Colorado statutes. TITLE 14 Domestic Matters
PART 3
ENFORCEMENT

14-13-301. Definitions.

As used in this part 3, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Petitioner" means a person who seeks enforcement of an order for the return of a child under the "Hague Convention on the Civil Aspects of International Child Abduction" or enforcement of a child-custody determination.

"Respondent" means a person against whom a proceeding has been commenced for enforcement of an order for the return of a child under the "Hague Convention on the Civil Aspects of International Child Abduction" or enforcement of a child-custody determination.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1530, § 1, effective July 1.

14-13-302. Enforcement under Hague Convention.

Under this part 3 a court of this state may enforce an order for the return of the child made under the "Hague Convention on the Civil Aspects of International Child Abduction" as if it were a child-custody determination.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1531, § 1, effective July 1.

14-13-303. Duty to enforce.

A court of this state shall recognize and enforce a child-custody determination of a court of another state if the latter court exercised jurisdiction in substantial conformity with this article or the determination was made under factual circumstances meeting the jurisdictional standards of this article and the determination has not been modified in accordance with this article.

A court of this state may utilize any remedy available under other law of this state to enforce a child-custody determination made by a court of another state. The remedies provided in this part 3 are cumulative and do not affect the availability of other remedies to enforce a child-custody determination.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1531, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 14-13-114 as it existed prior to 2000.

14-13-304. Temporary visitation or parenting time.

A court of this state that does not have jurisdiction to modify a child-custody determination may issue a temporary order enforcing:

A visitation or parenting time schedule made by a court of another state; or

The visitation or parenting time provisions of a child-custody determination of another state that does not provide for a specific visitation or parenting time schedule.

If a court of this state makes an order under paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of this section, it shall specify in the order a period that it considers adequate to allow the petitioner to obtain an order from a court having jurisdiction under criteria substantially in conformity with those criteria specified in part 2 of this article. The order remains in effect until an order is obtained from the other court or the period expires.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1531, § 1, effective July 1.

14-13-305. Registration of child-custody determination.

A child-custody determination issued by a court of another state may be registered in this state, with or without a simultaneous request for enforcement, by sending to the appropriate district court in this state:

A letter or other document requesting registration;

Two copies, including one certified copy, of the determination sought to be registered, and a statement under penalty of perjury that to the best of the knowledge and belief of the person seeking registration the order has not been modified; and

Except as otherwise provided in section 14-13-209, the name and address of the person seeking registration and any parent or person acting as a parent who has been awarded custody, allocated parental responsibilities, or granted visitation or parenting time in the child-custody determination sought to be registered.

On receipt of the documents required by subsection (1) of this section, the registering court shall:

Cause the determination to be filed as a foreign judgment, together with one copy of any accompanying documents and information, regardless of their form; and

Serve notice upon the persons named pursuant to paragraph (c) of subsection (1) of this section and provide them with an opportunity to contest the registration in accordance with this section.

The notice required by paragraph (b) of subsection (2) of this section must state that:

A registered determination is enforceable as of the date of the registration in the same manner as a determination issued by a court of this state;

A hearing to contest the validity of the registered determination must be requested within twenty-one days after service of notice; and

Failure to contest the registration will result in confirmation of the child-custody determination and preclude further contest of that determination with respect to any matter that could have been asserted.

A person seeking to contest the validity of a registered order must request a hearing within twenty-one days after service of the notice. At that hearing, the court shall confirm the registered order unless the person contesting registration establishes that:

The issuing court did not have jurisdiction under a provision of law adopted by that state that is in substantial conformity with part 2 of this article;

The child-custody determination sought to be registered has been vacated, stayed, or modified by a court having jurisdiction to do so under part 2 of this article; or

The person contesting registration was entitled to notice, but notice was not given in accordance with standards substantially in conformity with the standards set forth in section 14-13-108, in the proceedings before the court that issued the order for which registration is sought.

If a timely request for a hearing to contest the validity of the registration is not made, the registration is confirmed as a matter of law and the person requesting registration and all persons served must be notified of the confirmation.

Confirmation of a registered order, whether by operation of law or after notice and hearing, precludes further contest of the order with respect to any matter that could have been asserted at the time of registration.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1531, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2012:

(3)(b) amended, (SB 12-175), ch. 208, p. 834, § 37, effective July 1.

L. 2014:

IP(4) amended, (HB 14-1347), ch. 208, p. 769, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 14-13-117 as it existed prior to 2000.

14-13-306. Enforcement of registered determination.

A court of this state may grant any relief normally available under the law of this state to enforce a registered child-custody determination made by a court of another state.

A court of this state shall recognize and enforce, but may not modify, except in accordance with part 2 of this article, a registered child-custody determination of a court of another state.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1533, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 14-13-115 and 14-13-116, as they existed prior to 2000.

14-13-307. Simultaneous proceedings.

If a proceeding for enforcement under this part 3 is commenced in a court of this state and the court determines that a proceeding to modify the determination is pending in a court of another state having jurisdiction to modify the determination under a provision of law adopted by that state that is in substantial conformity with part 2 of this article, the enforcing court shall immediately communicate with the modifying court. The proceeding for enforcement continues unless the enforcing court, after consultation with the modifying court, stays or dismisses the proceeding.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1533, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 14-13-107 as it existed prior to 2000.

14-13-308. Expedited enforcement of child-custody determination.

A petition under this part 3 in which the petitioner is seeking expedited enforcement pursuant to this section must be verified. Certified copies of all orders sought to be enforced and of any order confirming registration must be attached to the petition. A copy of a certified copy of an order may be attached instead of the original.

A petition for expedited enforcement of a child-custody determination pursuant to this section must state:

Whether the court that issued the determination identified the jurisdictional basis it relied upon in exercising jurisdiction and, if so, what the basis was;

Whether the determination for which enforcement is sought has been vacated, stayed, or modified by a court whose decision must be enforced under this article and, if so, the identity of the court, the case number, and the nature of the proceeding;

Whether any proceeding has been commenced that could affect the current proceeding, including proceedings relating to domestic violence or domestic abuse, protective orders or restraining orders, termination of parental rights, and adoptions and, if so, the identity of the court, the case number, and the nature of the proceeding;

The present physical address of the child and the respondent, if known;

Whether relief in addition to the immediate physical custody of the child and attorney's fees is sought, including a request for assistance from law enforcement officials and, if so, the relief sought; and

If the child-custody determination has been registered and confirmed under section 14-13-305, the date and place of registration.

Upon the filing of a petition for expedited enforcement pursuant to this section, the court shall issue an order directing the respondent to appear in person at a hearing, with or without the child, and may enter any order necessary to ensure the safety of the parties and the child. The hearing must be held on the next judicial day after service of the order unless that date is impossible. In that event, the court shall hold the hearing on the first judicial day possible. The court may extend the date of hearing at the request of the petitioner.

An order issued under subsection (3) of this section must state the time and place of the hearing and advise the respondent that at the hearing the court will order that the petitioner may take immediate physical custody of the child and the payment of fees, costs, and expenses under section 14-13-312, and may schedule a hearing to determine whether further relief is appropriate, unless the respondent appears and establishes that:

The child-custody determination has not been registered and confirmed under section 14-13-305 and that:

The issuing court did not have jurisdiction under a provision of law adopted by that state that is in substantial conformity with part 2 of this article;

The child-custody determination for which enforcement is sought has been vacated, stayed, or modified by a court having jurisdiction to do so under a provision of law adopted by that state that is in substantial conformity with part 2 of this article;

The respondent was entitled to notice, but notice was not given in accordance with the standards substantially in conformity with the standards of section 14-13-108, in the proceedings before the court that issued the order for which enforcement is sought; or

The child-custody determination for which enforcement is sought was registered and confirmed under a provision of law adopted by that state that is in substantial conformity with section 14-13-304, but has been vacated, stayed, or modified by a court of a state having jurisdiction to do so under a provision of law adopted by that state that is in substantial conformity with part 2 of this article.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1533, § 1, effective July 1.

14-13-309. Service of petition and order.

Except as otherwise provided in section 14-13-311, the petition and order must be served, by any method authorized by the law of this state, upon respondent and any person who has physical custody of the child.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1535, § 1, effective July 1.

14-13-310. Hearing and order.

Unless the court issues a temporary emergency order pursuant to section 14-13-204, upon a finding that a petitioner is entitled to immediate physical custody of the child, the court shall order that the petitioner may take immediate physical custody of the child unless the respondent establishes that:

The child-custody determination has not been registered and confirmed under section 14-13-305 and that:

The issuing court did not have jurisdiction under part 2 of this article;

The child-custody determination for which enforcement is sought has been vacated, stayed, or modified by a court of a state having jurisdiction to do so under a provision of law adopted by that state that is in substantial conformity with part 2 of this article; or

The respondent was entitled to notice, but notice was not given in accordance with standards in substantial conformity with the standards set forth in section 14-13-108, in the proceedings before the court that issued the order for which enforcement is sought; or

The child-custody determination for which enforcement is sought was registered and confirmed under section 14-13-305 but has been vacated, stayed, or modified by a court of a state having jurisdiction to do so under this part 3.

The court shall award the fees, costs, and expenses authorized under section 14-13-312 and may grant additional relief, including a request for the assistance of law enforcement officials, and set a further hearing to determine whether additional relief is appropriate.

If a party called to testify refuses to answer on the ground that the testimony may be self-incriminating, the court may draw an adverse inference from the refusal.

A privilege against disclosure of communications between spouses and a defense of immunity based on the relationship of husband and wife or parent and child may not be invoked in a proceeding under this part 3.

A privilege against disclosure of communications between partners in a civil union and a defense of immunity based on the relationship of partners in a civil union or parent and child may not be invoked in a proceeding under this part 3.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1535, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(5) added, (SB 13-011), ch. 49, p. 164, § 16, effective May 1.

14-13-311. Warrant to take physical custody of child.

Upon the filing of a petition seeking enforcement of a child-custody determination, the petitioner may file a verified application for the issuance of a warrant to take physical custody of the child if the child is immediately likely to suffer serious physical harm or be removed from this state.

If the court, upon the testimony of the petitioner or other witness, finds that the child is imminently likely to suffer serious physical harm or be removed from this state, it may issue a warrant to take physical custody of the child. The petition must be heard on the next judicial day after the warrant is executed unless that date is impossible. In that event, the court shall hold the hearing on the first judicial day possible. The application for the warrant must include the statements required by section 14-13-308 (2).

A warrant to take physical custody of a child must:

Recite the facts upon which a conclusion of imminent serious physical harm or removal from the jurisdiction is based;

Direct law enforcement officers to take physical custody of the child immediately; and

Provide for the placement of the child pending final relief.

The respondent must be served with the petition, warrant, and order immediately after the child is taken into physical custody.

A warrant to take physical custody of a child is enforceable throughout this state. If the court finds on the basis of the testimony of the petitioner or other witness that a less intrusive remedy is not effective, it may authorize law enforcement officers to enter private property to take physical custody of the child. If required by exigent circumstances of the case, the court may authorize law enforcement officers to make a forcible entry at any hour.

The court may impose conditions upon placement of a child to ensure the appearance of the child and the child's custodian.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1536, § 1, effective July 1.

14-13-312. Costs, fees, and expenses.

The court shall award the prevailing party, including a state, necessary and reasonable expenses incurred by or on behalf of the prevailing party, including costs, communication expenses, attorney fees, investigative fees, expenses for witnesses, travel expenses, and child care during the course of the proceedings, unless the party from whom fees or expenses are sought establishes that the award would be clearly inappropriate.

The court may not assess fees, costs, or expenses against a state unless authorized by law other than this article.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1536, § 1, effective July 1.

14-13-313. Recognition and enforcement.

A court of this state shall accord full faith and credit to an order issued by another state and consistent with this article that enforces a child-custody determination by a court of another state unless the order has been vacated, stayed, or modified by a court having jurisdiction to do so under a provision of law adopted by that state that is in substantial conformity with part 2 of this article.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1537, § 1, effective July 1.

14-13-314. Appeals.

An appeal may be taken from a final order in a proceeding under this part 3 in accordance with expedited appellate procedures in other civil cases. Unless the court enters a temporary emergency order under section 14-13-204, the enforcing court may not stay an order enforcing a child-custody determination pending appeal.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1537, § 1, effective July 1.